Washington statutes.
RCW 35.80.020

Definitions.

The following terms, however used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

(1) "Board" shall mean the improvement board as provided for in RCW 35.80.030(1)(a);

(2) "Local governing body" shall mean the council, board, commission, or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality or county;

(3) "Municipality" shall mean any city, town or county in the state;

(4) "Public officer" shall mean any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality or county relating to health, fire, building regulation, or other activities concerning dwellings, buildings, structures, or premises in the municipality or county.

[ 1989 c 133 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 127 s 2; 1967 c 111 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.80.020. Prior: 1959 c 82 s 2.]